Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Subchapter 2. Licensing of Long-Term Care Facilities

§ 7103.
License.

A person shall not operate a nursing home, assisted living residence, home for persons who are terminally ill, residential care home, or therapeutic community residence without first obtaining a license.

A person shall not operate a nursing home as defined in this chapter or as defined in 18 V.S.A. chapter 46 except under the supervision of an administrator licensed in the manner provided in 18 V.S.A. chapter 46.

Residents of a home for persons who are terminally ill shall receive necessary medical and nursing services, which may be provided through outside providers.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 27

, § 4;

1964, No. 6

(Sp. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 4, 1964;

1965, No. 68

, § 2;

1969, No. 248

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 1, 1970;

1973, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1975, No. 221

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. July 1, 1977;

1985, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1993, No. 114

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1997, No. 61

, § 271d;

2009, No. 36

, § 1;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 219.

§ 7104.
Application.

An application for a license shall be made annually to the licensing agency upon forms provided by it and shall contain such information as the licensing agency reasonably requires.

HISTORY:

Amended

1965, No. 68

, § 3;

1975, No. 221

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1991, No. 253

(Adj. Sess.), § 9.

§ 7105.
License requirements.

Upon receipt of an application for license, the licensing agency shall issue a full license when it has determined that the applicant and facilities meet the standards established by the licensing agency. Licenses issued under this chapter shall expire one year after date of issuance or upon such uniform dates annually as the licensing agency may prescribe by rule. Licenses shall be issued only for the premises and persons named in the application and shall not be transferable or assignable. Licenses shall be posted in a conspicuous place on the licensed premises.

In its discretion, the licensing agency may issue a temporary license permitting operation of a nursing home, assisted living residence, therapeutic community residence, residential care home, or home for persons who are terminally ill for such period or periods and subject to such conditions as the licensing agency deems proper, but in no case shall a nursing home, assisted living residence, therapeutic community residence, residential care home, or home for persons who are terminally ill operate under a temporary license or renewal of a temporary license for a period exceeding 36 months.

An owner, licensee, or administrator shall disclose to the licensing agency any changes in the ownership interests in the company, ownership of any real property, management of the facility, or corporate structure that occur after the date the license is issued. The licensing agency may require the owner, licensee, or administrator to apply for a new license.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 27

, § 5;

1965, No. 68

, § 4;

1973, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1975, No. 221

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. July 1, 1976, § 9, eff. July 1, 1977;

1985, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1997, No. 61

, § 271e;

1997, No. 155

(Adj. Sess.), § 54;

2009, No. 36

, § 1;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 220;

2021, No. 20

, § 352.

§ 7106.
Variance.

The licensing agency may grant a variance from the provisions of this chapter or a rule adopted pursuant to this chapter.

Variances may be granted upon determination that:

strict compliance would impose a substantial hardship on the licensee;

the licensee will otherwise meet the goal of the statutory provision or rule; and

a variance will not result in less protection of the health, safety, and welfare of the residents.

A variance shall not be granted from a provision of this chapter or a rule pertaining to residents’ rights.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 88, eff. May 20, 2014.

§ 7107.
Unlicensed homes.

The licensing agency shall adopt rules governing the identification of unlicensed residential care homes, nursing homes, assisted living residences, therapeutic community residences, and homes for persons who are terminally ill.

No physician, surgeon, osteopath, chiropractor, or physician assistant licensed, certified, or registered under the provisions of Title 26; resident physician, intern, or any hospital administrator in any hospital in this State; registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, medical examiner, psychologist, mental health professional, social worker, probation officer, police officer, nursing home administrator, or employee; or owner, operator, or employee of a facility shall knowingly place, refer, or recommend placement of a person to such a facility if that facility is operating without a license.

Any person listed in subsection (b) of this section who is licensed or certified by the State of Vermont or who is employed by the State or a municipality and who knows or has reason to believe that a facility is operating without the license required under this chapter shall report the facility and address of the facility to the licensing agency.

The licensing agency shall investigate any report filed pursuant to this section and conduct an inspection as provided in section 7108 of this title.

Within 30 days following the date on which a license to operate any facility pursuant to this section is revoked or voluntarily relinquished, the operator shall obtain a new license or shall cause all of the residents in the facility to be moved promptly.
(e) (1) Within 30 days following the date on which a license to operate any facility pursuant to this section is revoked or voluntarily relinquished, the operator shall obtain a new license or shall cause all of the residents in the facility to be moved promptly.

The facility shall be responsible for securing suitable alternative placements for the residents and shall be responsible for the cost of the planning for the transition and transportation of the residents to the alternative placements.

Failure to comply with this subsection may result in penalties being assessed against the operator, the owner, or the facility as provided for in section 7111 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

1997, No. 61

, § 271f;

2009, No. 36

, § 1;

2013, No. 34

, § 30a;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 221;

2021, No. 20

, § 353.

§ 7108.
Inspection; technical assistance.

The licensing agency shall inspect a facility prior to issuing a license under this chapter.

The licensing agency may inspect a facility any time an inspection is authorized under this chapter and any other time it considers an inspection necessary to determine if a facility is in compliance with the provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter.

Authorized inspectors shall at all times without notice have access to all such facilities.

The living quarters of the manager of a facility, for purposes of this chapter, may be subject to inspection only if the inspector has reason to believe the permissible capacity of the facility has been exceeded and only for the purpose of determining if such a violation exists. The inspector shall permit the manager to accompany the inspector on such an inspection.

Within the limits of resources available, the licensing agency may provide technical assistance, education, and information to facilities to assist them to come into or remain in compliance with the provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter. The failure of the licensing agency to provide assistance under this subsection shall not relieve a facility from its duty to comply with provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1973, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1975, No. 221

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1985, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 89, eff. May 20, 2014;

2021, No. 20

, § 354.

§ 7109.
Investigation; complaint.

The licensing agency may investigate whenever it has reason to believe a violation of this chapter or the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter has occurred.

A person who believes that a violation has occurred may file a complaint with the licensing agency. The licensing agency shall investigate any complaint filed unless it reasonably believes that the complaint is without merit.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 7.

§ 7110.
Violation; notice.

If, as a result of an inspection or investigation, the licensing agency determines that a condition in the facility violates a rule or provision of this chapter, it shall prepare a written notice of violation, which shall state the following:

a description of each condition that constitutes a violation;

each rule or statutory provision alleged to have been violated;

the date by which the violation must be corrected;

sanctions the licensing agency may impose for failure to correct the violation or failure to provide proof of correction by the date specified;

the right to appeal the notice of violation as provided in section 7118 of this title; and

the right to apply for a variance as provided in section 7106 of this title.

The licensing agency may take immediate enforcement action when necessary to eliminate a condition that can reasonably be expected to cause death or serious physical or mental harm to residents or staff before it can be eliminated through the provisions of section 7111 of this title. A licensing agency taking such action shall explain that action and the reasons for it in the notice of violation.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.) § 8; amended

2019, No. 118

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. June 23, 2020.

§ 7111.
Enforcement; protection of residents.

The licensing agency shall enforce the provisions of this chapter to protect residents of facilities.

The licensing agency may require a facility to take corrective action to eliminate a violation of a rule or provision of this chapter within a specified period of time. If the licensing agency does require corrective action, the following provisions shall apply:

The licensing agency may, within the limits of resources available to it, provide technical assistance to the facility to enable it to comply with the provisions of this chapter.

The facility shall provide the licensing agency with proof of correction of the violation within the time specified.

If the facility has not corrected the violation by the time specified, the licensing agency may take such further action as it deems appropriate under this section.

The licensing agency may impose an administrative penalty against a facility for failure to correct a violation or failure to comply with a plan of corrective action for such a violation, as follows:
(c) (1) The licensing agency may impose an administrative penalty against a facility for failure to correct a violation or failure to comply with a plan of corrective action for such a violation, as follows:

up to $5.00 per resident or $50.00, whichever is greater, for each day a violation remains uncorrected if the rule or provision violated was adopted primarily for the administrative purposes of the licensing agency;

up to $8.00 per resident or $80.00, whichever is greater, for each day a violation remains uncorrected if the rule or provision violated was adopted primarily to protect the welfare or the rights of residents; and

up to $10.00 per resident or $100.00, whichever is greater, for each day a violation remains uncorrected if the rule or provision violated was adopted primarily to protect the health or safety of residents.

The licensing agency may impose an administrative penalty against a facility of up to $10.00 per resident or $100.00, whichever is greater, for each day a facility operates without a license when either:

the facility has not obtained a license; or

a license has been revoked or voluntarily relinquished and the operator fails to obtain a new license or to cause all of the residents to be moved promptly and appropriately.

For purposes of imposing administrative penalties under this subsection, a violation shall be deemed to have first occurred as of the date of the notice of violation.

The licensing agency may, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing, suspend, revoke, modify, or refuse to renew a license upon any of the following grounds:

violation by the licensee of any of the provisions of this chapter or the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter;

conviction of a crime for conduct that demonstrates the unfitness of the licensee or the principal owner to operate a facility under this chapter;

conduct inimical to the public health, morals, welfare, and safety of the people of the State of Vermont in the maintenance and operation of the premises for which a license is issued;

financial incapacity of the licensee to provide adequate care and services; or

failure to comply with a final decision or action of the licensing agency.

In the interest of the public health and safety, and pursuant to the provisions for the summary suspension of a license in

3 V.S.A. § 814(c)

, the licensing agency shall suspend the license of a nursing home that has been administered by a provisional administrator licensed under

18 V.S.A. § 2061

for the preceding 90 days and which nursing home is not presently administered by an administrator who is permanently licensed under

18 V.S.A. § 2055

.

The licensing agency may suspend admissions to a facility or transfer residents from a facility to an alternative placement, or both, for a violation that may directly impair the health, safety, or rights of residents or for operating without a license. Residents subject to transfer shall:

be allowed to participate in the decision-making process of the agency concerning the selection of an alternative placement;

receive adequate notice of a pending transfer; and

be allowed to contest their transfer in accordance with the procedures in section 7118 of this title.

The licensing agency, the Attorney General, or a resident may bring an action for injunctive relief against a facility in accordance with the Rules of Civil Procedure to enjoin any act or omission that constitutes a violation of this chapter or rules adopted pursuant to this chapter.

The Commissioner of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living, the Attorney General, or a resident or a resident’s legal representative may bring an action as provided for in subchapter 3 of this chapter.

The licensing agency may enforce a final order by filing a civil action in the Superior Court in the county in which the facility is located, or in Washington Superior Court.

The remedies provided in this chapter are cumulative.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 9; amended

2009, No. 36

, § 1;

2011, No. 63

, § E.329.1;

2021, No. 20

, § 355.

§ 7112.
Confidential information.

Information received by the licensing agency through filed reports, inspection, or as otherwise authorized under this chapter, except information that pertains to unsubstantiated complaints or the identity of residents and complainants, shall be made available to the public.

Prior to release of information, the Commissioner shall consult with representatives from the nursing home industry and the Office of State Long-Term Care Ombudsman to develop:

Guidelines for the release of information to the public that ensure the confidentiality and privacy of complainants and individuals who are receiving or have received care or services in nursing facilities in conformance with State and federal requirements.

Indicators, derived from information databases maintained by the licensing agency and the Division of Rate Setting, which shall be disseminated to consumers in a readily understandable format designed to facilitate consumers’ ability to compare the quality of care provided by nursing facilities. The Commissioner shall continually update quality indicators and refine and improve the information disseminated to consumers.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 63

, § E.329.2.

§ 7113.
Repealed. 2009, No. 36, § 1.

§ 7114.
Report.

The licensee shall file annually and on request such information, data, statistics, or schedules as the licensing agency may require.
The agency shall have the power to examine the books and accounts of any facility operated by any licensee if it is the opinion of the Secretary that the examination is necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1975, No. 221

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 7115.
Exception.

Nothing in this chapter or the rules adopted pursuant to this chapter shall be construed as authorizing the supervision, regulation, or control of the remedial care or treatment of residents or patients in any home or institution conducted for those who rely upon treatment by prayer or spiritual means in accordance with the creed or tenets of a recognized church or religious denomination, except as to the sanitary and safe condition of the premises, cleanliness of operation, and its physical equipment.

HISTORY:

Amended

2021, No. 20

, § 356.

§ 7116.
Criminal penalty.

A person who knowingly violates the licensure, reporting of unlicensed facilities, or confidentiality requirements of this chapter or the provisions relating to placing, referring, or recommending placement of a person in an unlicensed facility shall be fined not more than $500.00 or imprisoned not more than six months, or both.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 27

, § 6;

1964, No. 6

(Sp. Sess.), § 2, eff. March 4, 1964;

1973, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1985, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 11;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 90, eff. May 20, 2014.

§ 7117.
Rules.

In accordance with 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, the Secretary of Human Services may adopt reasonable rules to carry out the provisions of this chapter and may prescribe minimum standards of care, program administration, and sanitation for facilities licensed under this chapter.

No later than January 1, 1997, the Secretary of Human Services shall adopt comprehensive rules for licensing of nursing homes to include criteria deemed appropriate by the Secretary, including criteria for accessibility, quality, and safety standards. The rules for nursing home licensing shall:

require that nursing facilities provide the care and services necessary to help each resident attain or maintain the highest practicable physical, mental, and psychosocial well-being in accordance with a comprehensive assessment and plan of care and prevailing standards of care as determined by the Commissioner of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living; and

promote a standard of care that ensures that the ability of each resident to perform activities of daily living does not diminish unless the resident’s ability is diminished solely as a result of a change in the resident’s clinical condition.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 7; amended

1975, No. 221

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1981, No. 99

, § 2;

1995, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 18;

2013, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 91, eff. May 20, 2014.

§ 7118.
Appeals.

A person aggrieved by a decision or action of the licensing agency may file a request for a fair hearing with the Human Services Board as provided in

3 V.S.A. § 3091

.

A resident subject to transfer under subsection 7111(f) of this title may contest such transfer by filing a request for a fair hearing with the Human Services Board as provided in

3 V.S.A. § 3091

.

HISTORY:

Added

1973, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 8; amended

1985, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 12.